Utah statutes.
20A-16-302.   Methods of registering to vote.

(1)  To apply to register to vote, in addition to any other approved method, a covered voter may use a federal postcard application or the application's electronic equivalent.

(2) (a)  A covered voter may use the declaration accompanying a federal write-in absentee ballot to apply to register to vote simultaneously with the submission of the federal write-in absentee ballot, if the declaration is received by the Friday immediately before the election.

(b)  If the declaration is received after the Friday immediately before the election, the declaration shall be treated as an application to register to vote for subsequent elections.

(3) (a)  The lieutenant governor shall ensure that the electronic transmission system described in Subsection 20A-16-201(3) is capable of accepting both a federal postcard application and any other approved electronic registration application sent to the appropriate election official.

(b)  The voter may use the electronic transmission system or any other approved method to register to vote.



Enacted by Chapter 327, 2011 General Session

